Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201119-3501
Pension plans authorized; employees
covered; contributions; funding past service benefits; joinder in plan by
two or more cities; reports.

(1) The governing body of cities
of the first and second classes and villages may, by appropriate ordinance
or proper resolution, establish a pension plan designed and intended for the
benefit of the regularly employed or appointed full-time employees of the
city. Any recognized method of funding a pension plan may be employed. The
plan shall be established by appropriate ordinance or proper resolution, which
may provide for mandatory contribution by the employee. The city may also
contribute, in addition to any amounts contributed by the employee, amounts
to be used for the purpose of funding employee past service benefits. Any
two or more cities of the first and second classes and villages may jointly
establish such a pension plan by adoption of appropriate ordinances or resolutions.
Such a pension plan may be integrated with old age and survivors insurance,
otherwise generally known as social security.

(2)(a) Beginning December 31, 1998, and each December 31 thereafter,
the clerk of a city or village with a retirement plan established pursuant
to this section and section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall file
with the Public Employees Retirement Board an annual report on such plan and
shall submit copies of such report to the Auditor of Public Accounts. The Auditor
of Public Accounts may prepare a review of such report pursuant to section
84-304.02 but is not required to do so. The annual report shall
be in a form prescribed by the Public Employees Retirement Board and shall
contain the following information for each such retirement plan:

(i) The number of persons participating in the retirement plan;

(ii) The contribution rates of participants in the plan;

(iii) Plan assets and liabilities;

(iv) The names and positions of persons administering the plan;

(v) The names and positions of persons investing plan assets;

(vi) The form and nature of investments;

(vii) For each defined contribution plan, a full description of investment
policies and options available to plan participants; and

(viii) For each defined benefit plan, the levels of benefits of participants
in the plan, the number of members who are eligible for a benefit, and the
total present value of such members' benefits, as well as the funding sources
which will pay for such benefits.

If a plan contains no current active participants, the city or village
clerk may file in place of such report a statement with the Public Employees
Retirement Board indicating the number of retirees still drawing benefits,
and the sources and amount of funding for such benefits.

(b) Beginning December 31, 1998, and every four years thereafter, if
such retirement plan is a defined benefit plan, the city council or village
board shall cause to be prepared a quadrennial report and shall file the same
with the Public Employees Retirement Board and submit to the Auditor
of Public Accounts a copy of each report. The Auditor of Public Accounts may prepare a review of such
report pursuant to section 84-304.02 but is not required to do so. The
report shall consist of a full actuarial analysis of each such retirement
plan established pursuant to this section. The analysis shall be prepared
by an independent private organization or public entity employing actuaries
who are members in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries, and
which organization or entity has demonstrated expertise to perform this type
of analysis and is unrelated to any organization offering investment advice
or which provides investment management services to the retirement plan.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to firefighters or
police officers who are included under an existing pension or retirement system
established by the municipality employing such firefighters or police officers
or the Legislature. If a city of the first class decreases in population to
less than five thousand, as determined by the latest federal census, any police
officer or firefighter employed by such city on or prior to the date such
city becomes a city of the second class shall retain the level of benefits
established by the Legislature for police officers or firefighters employed
by a city of the first class on the date such city becomes a city of the second
class.

Laws 1957, c. 26, § 1, p. 180;

Laws 1963, c. 63, § 10, p. 262;

Laws 1967, c. 98, § 1, p. 297;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-328;

Laws 1969, c. 79, § 1, p. 410;

Laws 1974, LB 1002, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 291, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 145, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 21;

Laws 1999, LB 795, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB474, § 9.